dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Gj Y 53
SFX Gj єти л .
SFX Gj єти ла .
SFX Gj єти ло .
SFX Gj єти ли .
SFX Gj єти у .
SFX Gj єти ем .
SFX Gj єти еш .
SFX Gj єти е .
SFX Gj єти емо .
SFX Gj єти ете .
SFX Gj єти ут .
SFX Gj ти х .
SFX Gj ти ше .
SFX Gj ти хмо .
SFX Gj ти сте .
SFX Gj ти ху .
SFX Gj єти и .
SFX Gj єти имо .
SFX Gj єти ите .
SFX Gj єти учи .
SFX Gj єти учего .
SFX Gj єти учему .
SFX Gj єти учим .
SFX Gj єти учем .
SFX Gj єти учих .
SFX Gj єти учими .
SFX Gj єти уча .
SFX Gj єти учу .
SFX Gj єти учеј .
SFX Gj єти учеју .
SFX Gj єти уче .
SFX Gj єти емы .
SFX Gj єти емого .
SFX Gj єти емому .
SFX Gj єти емым .
SFX Gj єти емом .
SFX Gj єти емо .
SFX Gj єти ема .
SFX Gj єти ему .
SFX Gj єти емој .
SFX Gj єти емоју .
SFX Gj єти еми .
SFX Gj єти еме .
SFX Gj єти емых .
SFX Gj єти емым .
SFX Gj єти емыми .
SFX Gj єти ши .
SFX Gj єти ша .
SFX Gj єти ше .
SFX Gj єти ты .
SFX Gj єти та .
SFX Gj єти то .
SFX Gj єти тје .

SFX Gk Y 15
SFX Gk ы о .
SFX Gk ы а .
SFX Gk ы ого .
SFX Gk ы у .
SFX Gk ы ој .
SFX Gk ы ом .
SFX Gk ы ому .
SFX Gk 0 м .
SFX Gk ы оју .
SFX Gk ы и .
SFX Gk ы е .
SFX Gk 0 х .
SFX Gk 0 ми .
SFX Gk ы єјши .
SFX Gk ы єје .

SFX Gl Y 9
SFX Gl 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gl о о/xPxBxO .
SFX Gl о а/xPxE .
SFX Gl но ен/xPxE .
SFX Gl о у/xPxE .
SFX Gl о ах/xPxE .
SFX Gl о ам/xPxE .
SFX Gl 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Gl о ами/xPxE .

SFX Gm Y 2
SFX Gm 0 и .
SFX Gm 0 ју .

SFX Gn Y 11
SFX Gn 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gn а о/xPxBxO .
SFX Gn а ы/xPxE .
SFX Gn а у/xPxE .
SFX Gn ка ек/xPxE .
SFX Gn а є/xPxE .
SFX Gn 0 х/xPxE .
SFX Gn 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Gn а оју/xPxE .
SFX Gn 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX Gn а о/xPxE .

SFX Go Y 11
SFX Go 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Go 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX Go ец ци/xPxE .
SFX Go ец ца/xPxE .
SFX Go ец цев/xPxE .
SFX Go ец цу/xPxE .
SFX Go ец цах/xPxE .
SFX Go ец цам/xPxE .
SFX Go ец цем/xPxE .
SFX Go ец цами/xPxE .
SFX Go ец че/xPxE .

SFX Gp Y 68
SFX Gp ти л .
SFX Gp ти ла .
SFX Gp ти ло .
SFX Gp ти ли .
SFX Gp стити шчу .
SFX Gp ти м .
SFX Gp ти ш .
SFX Gp ти 0 .
SFX Gp ти мо .
SFX Gp и е .
SFX Gp ити ет .
SFX Gp ти х .
SFX Gp ти ше .
SFX Gp ти хмо .
SFX Gp ти сте .
SFX Gp ти ху .
SFX Gp ити ечи .
SFX Gp ити еча .
SFX Gp ити ече .
SFX Gp ти мы .
SFX Gp ти мого .
SFX Gp ти мому .
SFX Gp ти мым .
SFX Gp ти мом .
SFX Gp ти мо .
SFX Gp ти ма .
SFX Gp ти му .
SFX Gp ти мој .
SFX Gp ти моју .
SFX Gp ти ми .
SFX Gp ти ме .
SFX Gp ти мых .
SFX Gp ти мым .
SFX Gp ти мыми .
SFX Gp ти вши .
SFX Gp ти вшего .
SFX Gp ти вшему .
SFX Gp ти вшим .
SFX Gp ти вшем .
SFX Gp ти вших .
SFX Gp ти вшими .
SFX Gp ти вша .
SFX Gp ти вшу .
SFX Gp ти вшеј .
SFX Gp ти вшеју .
SFX Gp ти вше .
SFX Gp стити шчены .
SFX Gp стити шченого .
SFX Gp стити шченому .
SFX Gp стити шченым .
SFX Gp стити шченом .
SFX Gp стити шчени .
SFX Gp стити шчене .
SFX Gp стити шченых .
SFX Gp стити шчеными .
SFX Gp стити шчена .
SFX Gp стити шчену .
SFX Gp стити шченој .
SFX Gp стити шченоју .
SFX Gp стити шчено .
SFX Gp стити шченје/xPxE .
SFX Gp стити шченја/xPxE .
SFX Gp стити шченју/xPxE .
SFX Gp стити шченјем/xPxE .
SFX Gp стити шчениј/xPxE .
SFX Gp стити шченјам/xPxE .
SFX Gp стити шченјами/xPxE .
SFX Gp стити шченјах/xPxE .

SFX Gq Y 7
SFX Gq 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gq а о/xPxBxO .
SFX Gq а у/xPxE .
SFX Gq а ы/xPxE .
SFX Gq а є/xPxE .
SFX Gq а оју/xPxE .
SFX Gq а о/xPxE .

SFX Gr Y 4
SFX Gr ого то .
SFX Gr го м .
SFX Gr го му .
SFX Gr ого ым .

SFX Gs Y 6
SFX Gs 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gs 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Gs 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Gs 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Gs 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX Gs к че/xPxE .

SFX Gt Y 5
SFX Gt 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gt е е/xPxBxO .
SFX Gt е а/xPxE .
SFX Gt е у/xPxE .
SFX Gt 0 м/xPxE .

SFX Gu Y 8
SFX Gu 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gu 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Gu 0 и/xPxE .
SFX Gu 0 иј/xPxE .
SFX Gu 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Gu 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Gu 0 ју/xPxE .
SFX Gu 0 ами/xPxE .

SFX Gv Y 8
SFX Gv 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gv о а/xPxE .
SFX Gv о 0 .
SFX Gv о у/xPxE .
SFX Gv о ах/xPxE .
SFX Gv о ам/xPxE .
SFX Gv 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Gv о ами/xPxE .

SFX Gw Y 68
SFX Gw ти л .
SFX Gw ти ла .
SFX Gw ти ло .
SFX Gw ти ли .
SFX Gw сити шу .
SFX Gw ти м .
SFX Gw ти ш .
SFX Gw ти 0 .
SFX Gw ти мо .
SFX Gw и е .
SFX Gw ити ет .
SFX Gw ти х .
SFX Gw ти ше .
SFX Gw ти хмо .
SFX Gw ти сте .
SFX Gw ти ху .
SFX Gw ити ечи .
SFX Gw ити еча .
SFX Gw ити ече .
SFX Gw ти мы .
SFX Gw ти мого .
SFX Gw ти мому .
SFX Gw ти мым .
SFX Gw ти мом .
SFX Gw ти мо .
SFX Gw ти ма .
SFX Gw ти му .
SFX Gw ти мој .
SFX Gw ти моју .
SFX Gw ти ми .
SFX Gw ти ме .
SFX Gw ти мых .
SFX Gw ти мым .
SFX Gw ти мыми .
SFX Gw ти вши .
SFX Gw ти вшего .
SFX Gw ти вшему .
SFX Gw ти вшим .
SFX Gw ти вшем .
SFX Gw ти вших .
SFX Gw ти вшими .
SFX Gw ти вша .
SFX Gw ти вшу .
SFX Gw ти вшеј .
SFX Gw ти вшеју .
SFX Gw ти вше .
SFX Gw сити шены .
SFX Gw сити шеного .
SFX Gw сити шеному .
SFX Gw сити шеным .
SFX Gw сити шеном .
SFX Gw сити шени .
SFX Gw сити шене .
SFX Gw сити шеных .
SFX Gw сити шеными .
SFX Gw сити шена .
SFX Gw сити шену .
SFX Gw сити шеној .
SFX Gw сити шеноју .
SFX Gw сити шено .
SFX Gw сити шенје/xPxE .
SFX Gw сити шенја/xPxE .
SFX Gw сити шенју/xPxE .
SFX Gw сити шенјем/xPxE .
SFX Gw сити шениј/xPxE .
SFX Gw сити шенјам/xPxE .
SFX Gw сити шенјами/xPxE .
SFX Gw сити шенјах/xPxE .

SFX Gx Y 81
SFX Gx ојдти шел .
SFX Gx ојдти шла .
SFX Gx ојдти шло .
SFX Gx ојдти шли .
SFX Gx ти у .
SFX Gx ти ем .
SFX Gx ти еш .
SFX Gx ти е .
SFX Gx ти емо .
SFX Gx ти ете .
SFX Gx ти ут .
SFX Gx ти ех .
SFX Gx ти еше .
SFX Gx ти ехмо .
SFX Gx ти есте .
SFX Gx ти еху .
SFX Gx ти и .
SFX Gx ти имо .
SFX Gx ти ите .
SFX Gx ти учи .
SFX Gx ти учего .
SFX Gx ти учему .
SFX Gx ти учим .
SFX Gx ти учем .
SFX Gx ти учих .
SFX Gx ти учими .
SFX Gx ти уча .
SFX Gx ти учу .
SFX Gx ти учеј .
SFX Gx ти учеју .
SFX Gx ти уче .
SFX Gx ти омы .
SFX Gx ти омого .
SFX Gx ти омому .
SFX Gx ти омым .
SFX Gx ти омом .
SFX Gx ти омо .
SFX Gx ти ома .
SFX Gx ти ому .
SFX Gx ти омој .
SFX Gx ти омоју .
SFX Gx ти оми .
SFX Gx ти оме .
SFX Gx ти омых .
SFX Gx ти омым .
SFX Gx ти омыми .
SFX Gx ти омо .
SFX Gx ојдти шевши .
SFX Gx ојдти шевшего .
SFX Gx ојдти шевшему .
SFX Gx ојдти шевшим .
SFX Gx ојдти шевшем .
SFX Gx ојдти шевших .
SFX Gx ојдти шевшими .
SFX Gx ојдти шевша .
SFX Gx ојдти шевшу .
SFX Gx ојдти шевшеј .
SFX Gx ојдти шевшеју .
SFX Gx ојдти шевше .
SFX Gx ти ены .
SFX Gx ти еного .
SFX Gx ти еному .
SFX Gx ти еным .
SFX Gx ти еном .
SFX Gx ти ени .
SFX Gx ти ене .
SFX Gx ти еных .
SFX Gx ти еными .
SFX Gx ти ена .
SFX Gx ти ену .
SFX Gx ти еној .
SFX Gx ти еноју .
SFX Gx ти ено .
SFX Gx ти енје/xPxE .
SFX Gx ти енја/xPxE .
SFX Gx ти енју/xPxE .
SFX Gx ти енјем/xPxE .
SFX Gx ти ениј/xPxE .
SFX Gx ти енјам/xPxE .
SFX Gx ти енјами/xPxE .
SFX Gx ти енјах/xPxE .

SFX Gy Y 9
SFX Gy 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gy о о/xPxBxO .
SFX Gy о а/xPxE .
SFX Gy о 0 .
SFX Gy о у/xPxE .
SFX Gy о ах/xPxE .
SFX Gy о ам/xPxE .
SFX Gy 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Gy о ами/xPxE .

SFX Gz Y 12
SFX Gz небуд енебуд .
SFX Gz небуд анебуд .
SFX Gz небуд егонебуд .
SFX Gz небуд унебуд .
SFX Gz небуд ејнебуд .
SFX Gz небуд емнебуд .
SFX Gz небуд емунебуд .
SFX Gz небуд имнебуд .
SFX Gz небуд ејунебуд .
SFX Gz небуд инебуд .
SFX Gz небуд ихнебуд .
SFX Gz небуд иминебуд .

SFX HA Y 11
SFX HA 0 0/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX HA 0 и/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 а/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 ев/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 у/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 ем/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX HA ц че/xPxE .

SFX HB Y 8
SFX HB 0 0/xPxE .
SFX HB 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX HB 0 и/xPxE .
SFX HB 0 иј/xPxE .
SFX HB 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX HB 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX HB 0 ју/xPxE .
SFX HB 0 ами/xPxE .

SFX HC Y 28
SFX HC 0 0/xPxE .
SFX HC ы о/xBxPxE .
SFX HC ы а/xPxE .
SFX HC ы ого/xPxE .
SFX HC ы у/xPxE .
SFX HC ы ој/xPxE .
SFX HC ы ом/xPxE .
SFX HC ы ому/xPxE .
SFX HC 0 м/xPxE .
SFX HC ы оју/xPxE .
SFX HC ы и/xPxE .
SFX HC ы е/xPxE .
SFX HC 0 х/xPxE .
SFX HC 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX HC окы ши/zx .
SFX HC окы шего/zx .
SFX HC окы шему/zx .
SFX HC окы шим/zx .
SFX HC окы шем/zx .
SFX HC окы ше/zx .
SFX HC окы ша/zx .
SFX HC окы шу/zx .
SFX HC окы шеј/zx .
SFX HC окы шеју/zx .
SFX HC окы ших/zx .
SFX HC окы шим/zx .
SFX HC окы шими/zx .
SFX HC окы је/zx .
