dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.dic
жрєти/Gj
всакодневны/Gk
платно/Gl
осмнадсет/Gm
кого/Gr
барок/Gs
радио/Gv
бєженец/Go
одојдти/Gx
чијнебуд/Gz
близнец/HA
широкы/HC
борба/Gq
ангола/Gq
шолк/Gs
осм/Gm
говно/Gl
луч/HB
багно/Gy
јесенј/HB
двадесет/Gm
брадавичка/Gn
посрєдны/Gk
јединнадсет/Gm
кралјевство/Gy
чловєк/Gs
деветнадсет/Gm
пет/Gm
палјто/Gy
тринадсет/Gm
носити/Gw
седмнадсет/Gm
четыринадсет/Gm
чуджинец/Go
одмстити/Gp
седм/Gm
солј/HB
табак/Gs
десет/Gm
срєдны/Gk
европа/Gq
област/Gu
шестнадсет/Gm
вєч/HB
вето/Gy
гостити/Gp
изгласити/Gw
срєднјевєчје/Gt
шест/Gm
гумно/Gl
глубокы/HC
тридесет/Gm
безпосрєдны/Gk
баснј/HB
просити/Gw
разпустити/Gp
отец/Go
седмдесет/Gm
плєснј/HB
једро/Gy
снижка/Gn
опростити/Gp
петдесет/Gm
деветдесет/Gm
спросити/Gw
продаж/HB
канада/Gq
послєдны/Gk
петнадсет/Gm
бедро/Gy
физика/Gq
ирак/Gs
дванадсет/Gm
девет/Gm
квасити/Gw
гето/Gy
маст/Gu
спустити/Gp
крестити/Gp
мыслј/HB
мозамбик/Gs
нємец/Go
ос/Gu
полјска/Gq
четыридесет/Gm
осмдесет/Gm
метро/Gy
здравоохранјенје/Gt
украјина/Gq
шестдесет/Gm
вугрец/HA
аеронавтика/Gq
водораст/Gu
контролј/HB
вступјенје/Gt
изкусити/Gw
прєдны/Gk
поручителјство/Gy
извєстити/Gp
доносити/Gw
умєстити/Gp
укрыванје/Gt
велжност/Gu
продавец/Go
притиск/Gs
прєдпослєдны/Gk
чистити/Gp
талирка/Gn
односити/Gw
стебло/Gy
литванец/Go
слезк/Gs
африка/Gq
бојазнј/HB
антарктида/Gq
вдечност/Gu
супроводженје/Gt
задны/Gk
изпустити/Gp
полноч/HB
изојдти/Gx
обојдти/Gx
прєносити/Gw
вносити/Gw
разносити/Gw
мстити/Gp
којнебуд/Gz
непосрєдны/Gk
барвиво/Gy
прошлогодишны/Gk
покровност/Gu
криж/HB
арктика/Gq
прємєстити/Gp
бабушка/Gn
чловєколјубје/Gt
чрвенец/Go
хытрец/HA
ходженје/Gt
изнаходливост/Gu
једноночка/Gn
јутришны/Gk
утришны/Gk
јутро/Gy
каждогодишны/Gk
крајнец/HA
неможност/Gu
прєнебрєженје/Gt
обручка/Gn
одпрєти/Gj
опустити/Gp
оружјеносец/Go
осмыслјеност/Gu
повстанец/Go
различност/Gu
сєвероизток/Gs
словенец/Go
споразумєванје/Gt
течност/Gu
уважанје/Gt
всакогодишны/Gk
изсмєшка/Gn
зналост/Gu
болєзнј/HB
годишны/Gk
одзависити/Gw
аплодованје/Gt
лєнивец/Go
подлец/HA
словачка/Gn
изток/Gs
оригиналност/Gu
куба/Gq
телевидєнје/Gt
красавец/Go
кєшенј/HB
венезуела/Gq
пушка/Gn
обезчестити/Gp
првенство/Gy
часованје/Gt
челик/Gs
днешны/Gk
хиперсвез/Gu
хранјенец/Go
художство/Gy
изгнанје/Gt
изкосити/Gw
каточка/Gn
консервативец/Go
крзно/Gl
купопродаж/HB
укусити/Gw
неуступливы/Gk
пластик/Gs
покрестити/Gp
працодавец/Go
прогласити/Gw
пустити/Gp
роптанје/Gt
шчедрост/Gu
секретарка/Gn
стежка/Gn
супружство/Gy
тєнј/HB
вєродостојност/Gu
вниманје/Gt
долгочасити/Gw
јединачка/Gn
језыкотворец/Go
нынєшны/Gk
стварност/Gu
согласны/Gk
зрєнје/Gt
јазвец/HA
мєрило/Gy
помєстити/Gp
тунец/Go
возносити/Gw
опрєти/Gj
паст/Gu
прєти/Gj
прежка/Gn
припустити/Gp
родописец/Go
спрєти/Gj
запропастити/Gp
аритметика/Gq
корабокрушенец/Go
себелјубје/Gt
сеженј/HB
иностранец/Go
прострєти/Gj
разпрострєти/Gj
двојточка/Gn
обвєстити/Gp
величство/Gy
внутришны/Gk
гватемала/Gq
гајана/Gq
цинк/Gs
платина/Gq
прєвысити/Gw
злост/Gu
изпросити/Gw
месожерец/Go
фазованје/Gt
грабєж/HB
фортепиано/Gy
чајка/Gn
варшава/Gq
минск/Gs
етика/Gq
мудрец/HA
противрєчност/Gu
покусити/Gw
прочистити/Gp
абракадабра/Gq
амонијак/Gs
автоматика/Gq
бароко/Gy
бєсити/Gw
бојец/Go
брвно/Gl
чашка/Gn
далјны/Gk
дивина/Gq
длато/Gy
гасити/Gw
гнитје/Gt
голєнј/HB
храбрец/HA
сразумєлост/Gu
јединец/Go
једноокы/HC
казнј/HB
кокошка/Gn
косоокы/HC
красити/Gw
кресало/Gy
кривобокы/HC
кудєлј/HB
лајанје/Gt
лјстити/Gp
лєтны/Gk
лжец/HA
мєдны/Gk
младеж/HB
модроокы/HC
мрачност/Gu
мртвец/HA
мудо/Gy
мушка/Gn
намастити/Gp
напрєти/Gj
наручје/Gt
навєсити/Gw
очистити/Gp
одпросити/Gw
охладженје/Gt
равност/Gu
разчистити/Gp
разкош/HB
снєгурочка/Gn
стрєлец/Go
вапно/Gl
волапук/Gs
вонј/HB
зеленј/HB
зодиак/Gs
каро/Gy
флегма/Gq
возкресити/Gw
стоножка/Gn
жовиалност/Gu
неодчуджајемы/Gk
блекджек/Gs
безвєрје/Gt
лјулјка/Gn
подојдти/Gx
субтилност/Gu
оногдашны/Gk
студио/Gv
торнадо/Gy
естетика/Gq
користити/Gp
вчерашны/Gk
австријец/Go
компатибилност/Gu
тканј/HB
подталирка/Gn
петно/Gl
жрец/HA
европејка/Gn
сдешны/Gk
фехтованје/Gt
брадобривец/Go
манго/Gy
обложка/Gn
аеродинамика/Gq
југоизток/Gs
поддржка/Gn
дупло/Gy
чешка/Gn
косметика/Gq
наслєдованје/Gt
